Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-716
Commission; members; term; vacancy.

The term of office of each member of the Commission on Judicial Qualifications, except the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, shall be four years. The term of the Chief Justice shall be permanent. In the event of a vacancy, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original members are appointed and the individuals so appointed shall serve for the balance of the original term. Any member of the commission shall be eligible for reappointment for an additional term without regard to the number of years that such individual has served as a member of the commission.

Laws 1967, c. 141, § 2, p. 431;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 124;

Laws 1981, LB 475, § 2.